Nebraska, session 109, LB868.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB868 LB868
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 77-2007.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2007.03 (1) Property transferred to either (a) (1) the United
States, or any of its departments, instrumentalities, or agencies, or (b)
(2) this state, or any governmental subdivision, department, agency, or
instrumentality thereof, any municipal corporation or body politic
created by or under the laws of Nebraska, or any agency, institution,
foundation, or fund administered or operated by any of the same shall be
exempt from any inheritance tax imposed by sections 77-2001 to 77-2006,
and any amendments thereto.
(2)(a) If a decedent was the victim of a homicide or is a potential
victim of a homicide, then any interested party may file an application
for the inheritance tax exemption described in subdivision (2)(b) of this
section with the Department of Revenue on a form prescribed by the
department.
(b) If the decedent is determined to be the victim of a homicide,
then any interest in property passing from such decedent shall be exempt
from any inheritance tax imposed by sections 77-2001 to 77-2006, and any
amendments thereto.
(c) A decedent shall be conclusively presumed to be the victim of a
homicide if the person causing the decedent's death is convicted under
section 28-303, 28-304, 28-305, or 28-306. In the absence of such a
conviction, the court having jurisdiction may determine by a
preponderance of the evidence whether the decedent was the victim of a
homicide.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, homicide has the same meaning
as in section 28-302.
(e) This subsection applies to decedents dying on or after June 1,
2026.
Sec. 2. Section 77-2010, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-2-

LB868 LB868
2026 2026
77-2010 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), All taxes imposed
by sections 77-2001 to 77-2037, unless otherwise herein provided for,
shall be due and payable twelve months after the date of the death of the
decedent, and interest at the rate specified in section 45-104.01, as
such rate may from time to time be adjusted by the Legislature, shall be
charged and collected on any unpaid taxes due from the date the same
became payable, and in all cases in which the personal representatives or
trustees do not pay such tax within twelve months from the death of the
decedent, they shall be required to give bond in the form and to the
effect prescribed in section 77-2009 for the payment of the tax together
with interest. In addition, for failure to file an appropriate proceeding
for the determination of the tax within twelve months after the date of
the death of the decedent there shall be added to the amount due a
penalty of five percent per month or fraction thereof, up to a maximum
penalty of twenty-five percent of the unpaid taxes due. The filing of a
petition or an application for probate proceedings or the filing of an
application under section 77-2018.07 and payment of the tentative tax
payment within twelve months of the decedent's death shall be considered
an appropriate proceeding for the determination to avoid a penalty and to
stop the accrual of a penalty. In addition, the county court may abate
this penalty if good cause is shown for failure to file.
(2) If an application for an inheritance tax exemption under section
77-2007.03 is filed with the Department of Revenue within twelve months
after the date of the death of the decedent then any inheritance tax
imposed by sections 77-2001 to 77-2006, and any amendments thereto, shall
be due and payable twelve months after the determination that the
decedent is not the victim of a homicide, and interest at the rate
specified in section 45-104.01, as such rate may from time to time be
adjusted by the Legislature, shall be charged and collected on any unpaid
taxes due from the date the same became payable, and in all cases in
which the personal representatives or trustees do not pay such tax within
-3-

LB868 LB868
2026 2026
twelve months after the determination that the decedent is not the victim
of a homicide, they shall be required to give bond in the form and to the
effect prescribed in section 77-2009 for the payment of the tax together
with interest. In addition, for failure to file an appropriate proceeding
for the determination of the tax within twelve months after the
determination that the decedent is not the victim of a homicide there
shall be added to the amount due a penalty of five percent per month or
fraction thereof, up to a maximum penalty of twenty-five percent of the
unpaid taxes due. The filing of a petition or an application for probate
proceedings or the filing of an application under section 77-2018.07 and
payment of the tentative tax payment within twelve months after the
determination that the decedent is not the victim of a homicide shall be
considered an appropriate proceeding for the determination to avoid a
penalty and to stop the accrual of a penalty. In addition, the county
court may abate this penalty if good cause is shown for failure to file.
Sec. 3. Original sections 77-2007.03 and 77-2010, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-4-